Utah statutes.
48-3a-904.   Amendment of foreign registration statement.

A registered foreign limited liability company shall deliver to the division for filing an amendment to its foreign registration statement if there is a change in:

(1)  the name of the foreign limited liability company;

(2)  the foreign limited liability company's jurisdiction of formation;

(3)  an address required by Subsection 48-3a-903(4); or

(4)  the information required by Subsection 48-3a-903(5).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

